Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Enterprise Initiative Act

154.20-200.
Definitions for KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

As used in KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Agreement” means any agreement made pursuant to KRS 154.20-210 between the authority and an approved company with respect to an economic development project in which inducements are granted.

“Approval” means action taken by the authority that authorizes the eligible company to receive inducements in connection with an economic development project under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 and that designates the eligible company as an approved company.

“Approved company” means an eligible company that initiates an economic development project in the Commonwealth whose application has been approved by the authority.

“Approved expense” means:

For an approved company that establishes a new facility or expands an existing facility:

The cost of building and construction materials, upon which Kentucky sales and use tax as defined in KRS Chapter 139 is paid, purchased in connection with the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of an economic development project; and

The cost of equipment purchased and used in research and development, at the economic development project, upon which Kentucky sales and use tax as defined in KRS Chapter 139 is paid.

Approved expenses may only be incurred during the life of the project, not to exceed eighteen (18) months from the date an eligible company is designated an approved company by the authority. Provided, however, that the authority may grant a twelve (12) month extension of the project for good cause shown. Approved expenses shall not include any expenditure made before the date the company is approved by the authority.

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

“Economic development project” or “project” means a new or expanded service or technology, manufacturing, or tourism attraction activity, conducted by the approved company at a specific site in the Commonwealth, including the acquisition of real property by an approved company and the construction, installation, and rehabilitation of fixtures, and facilities, necessary or desirable for improvement of real estate owned, used, or occupied by the approved company, excluding the cost of labor. The minimum investment for an economic development project located in a preference zone shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and for a project not located in a preference zone, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or other legal entity that is primarily engaged in manufacturing, service or technology, or operating or developing a tourism attraction. Any company whose primary purpose is retail sales shall not be an eligible company.

“Equipment used in research and development” means:

“Equipment” means assets used in the operation of a business which are subject to depreciation under Sections 167 and 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, including assets which are expensed under Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code. The term “equipment” shall not include any tangible personal property used to maintain, restore, mend, or repair machinery or equipment, consumable operating supplies, office supplies, or maintenance supplies; and

“Research and development” means experimental or laboratory activity that has as its ultimate goals the development of new products, the improvement of existing products, the development of new uses for existing products, or the development or improvement of methods for producing products. “Research and development” does not include testing or inspection of materials or products for quality control purposes, efficiency surveys, management studies, consumer surveys, or other market research, advertising or promotional activities, or research in connection with literary, historical or similar projects.

“Inducements” means the sales and use tax refund allowed to an approved company for approved expenses under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

“Life of the project” or “project life” means the eighteen (18) month period beginning on the date the company is designated as an approved company by the authority and the twelve (12) month extension if the extension is granted by the authority.

“Manufacturing” means to make, assemble, process, produce, or perform any other activity that changes the form or conditions of raw materials and other property, and shall include any ancillary activity to the manufacturing process, such as storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities;
(11) (a)

“Manufacturing” means to make, assemble, process, produce, or perform any other activity that changes the form or conditions of raw materials and other property, and shall include any ancillary activity to the manufacturing process, such as storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities;

“Manufacturing” does not include any activity involving the performance of work classified by the divisions, including successor divisions, of mining in accordance with the “North American Industry Classification System,” as revised by the United States Office of Management and Budget from time to time, or any successor publication.

“Preference zone” or “zone” means the geographic area that was designated as an enterprise zone pursuant to KRS 154.45-050, and that was in existence as an enterprise zone on December 31, 2003. No enterprise zone may be expanded after March 18, 2005. Enterprise zone designations that are scheduled to expire, pursuant to KRS 154.45-050(2), shall expire as scheduled. All preference zones shall expire on December 31, 2007.

“Sales and use tax” means those taxes paid to the Commonwealth for the purchase of goods pursuant to KRS Chapter 139.

“Service or technology” means either:
(14) (a)

“Service or technology” means either:

Any activity involving the performance of work except work classified by the divisions, including successor divisions, of agriculture, forestry and fishing, mining, utilities, construction, manufacturing, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate rental and leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, and public administration in accordance with the “North American Industry Classification System,” as revised by the United States Office of Management and Budget from time to time, or any successor publication; or

Regional or headquarters operations of an entity engaged in an activity listed in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, “service or technology” shall not include any activity involving the performance of work by an individual who is providing direct service to the public pursuant to a license issued by the state or an association that licenses in lieu of the state.

“Tourism attraction” shall have the meaning assigned in KRS 148.851.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 36, effective March 18, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 214, effective July 12, 2006.

154.20-202.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations — Requirements for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects.

The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for approving eligible companies pursuant to KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

Relevant standards for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects shall include but are not limited to creditworthiness of the eligible company, employment opportunities for Kentucky residents, including wages to be paid, whether the project is located in a preference zone, whether the eligible company is participating in other incentive programs pursuant to KRS Chapter 154 for the project, and the likelihood that the project will be an economic success. An eligible company with an economic development project located in a preference zone shall be given priority for approval.

An eligible company shall certify to the authority, by written application provided by the authority, the following:

That the company is making a minimum investment of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the project, if the project is located in a preference zone or five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the project, if the project is not located in a preference zone;

A description of the project;

An estimate of the expenses for which the company shall seek approval;

Supporting documentation, as requested by the authority; and

Any other information requested by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 37, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-203.
Deadline for new applications — Governing law for outstanding approved projects.

New applications shall not be accepted or considered under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 on or after June 26, 2009. All outstanding approved projects as of June 26, 2009, shall continue to be governed by the provisions of KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 24, effective June 26, 2009.

154.20-204.
Total tax refund incentive — Application and approval of eligible company — Transfer of designation as approved company.

The total tax refund incentive available for commitment by the authority for all projects, for each fiscal year, shall not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for building and construction materials and five million dollars ($5,000,000) for equipment used in research and development.

If an eligible company proposes to locate or expand its business in the state, the eligible company may submit an application to the authority to become an approved company pursuant to KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

When the application of an eligible company is complete, it shall be brought before the authority for approval.

The eligible company shall only be designated an approved company for the specific, discrete project contained in its application.

A company may transfer its designation as an approved company for the project to another company upon prior notification to the authority in a manner prescribed by the authority. The company to which approval is transferred shall be eligible for the incentives to which the transferring company was entitled on the entire project.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 38, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-206.
Authorization of sales and use tax refund for approved company — Administrative regulations.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 139.770 to the contrary, an approved company under the terms of KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 may receive a tax refund of sales and use tax paid on approved expenses for the cost of building and construction materials that are permanently incorporated as an improvement to real property to an economic development project and equipment used in research and development at an economic development project. The approved company shall have no obligation to refund or otherwise return any amount of the sales and use tax refund to the person who originally collected the tax and remitted it to the state.

An approved company shall only apply for a refund:

Of sales and use tax paid for construction materials and building fixtures and for equipment used in research and development purchased during the life of the economic development project not to exceed the amount specified in the approved company’s agreement, as defined in KRS 154.20-200; and

Within sixty (60) days after the completion of the economic development project or the expiration of the life of the project, whichever occurs first.

An approved company shall execute information-sharing agreements prescribed by the Department of Revenue with contractors, vendors, and other related parties to verify construction material and building fixture costs and equipment used in research and development, including applicable taxes, for the economic development project.

Interest shall not be allowed or paid on any refund made under the provisions of this section. The Department of Revenue may examine any refund within four (4) years from the date the refund application is received. An overpayment resulting from the examination shall be repaid to the State Treasury. Any amount required to be repaid is subject to the interest provisions of KRS 131.183 and to the penalty provisions of KRS 131.180.

The Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, and shall require the filing of forms designed by the Department of Revenue to reflect the intent of KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 39, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-208.
Time for application and approval of eligible company as approved company.

An eligible company may apply to be designated an approved company under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 by the authority on and after October 1, 2005.

No approvals under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 shall be effective before January 1, 2006.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 40, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-210.
Agreement between authority and approved company.

Before any approved company is granted inducements as provided in KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216, an agreement with respect to the company’s economic development project shall be entered into between the authority and the approved company. The terms and provisions of the agreement, including the amount of approved expenses and the maximum inducement, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, except that each agreement shall include the following provisions:

The term of an agreement shall not be longer than eighteen (18) months from the date of approval of the company. The agreement may be extended by the authority an additional twelve (12) months for good cause shown by approval of the authority and notation upon the face of the agreement. The authority shall notify the Department of Revenue of any such extension; and

The agreement shall include:

A description of the project for which the inducements have been authorized;

A description of the authorized expenses;

The total inducements allowed for the project, not to exceed the amount negotiated by the authority and the company; and

A provision that the inducements are not assignable without written notice to the authority before any assignment is made.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 41, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-212.
Company’s filings under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 subject to Open Records Act.

The contents of a company’s filings under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 42, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-214.
Authority to report annually to Legislative Research Commission and Governor.

The authority shall annually submit a complete and detailed report of the use of the incentives and participation of approved companies under KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 within one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of each fiscal year to the Legislative Research Commission and to the Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 43, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-216.
Short Title — Kentucky Enterprise Initiative Act.

KRS 154.20-200 to 154.20-216 shall be known as the Kentucky Enterprise Initiative Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 44, effective March 18, 2005.

154.20-230.
Definitions for KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240.

As used in KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240:

“Application” means a document submitted by small businesses and investors, on a form supplied by the authority, for the purpose of requesting certification to participate in the program and to apply for a credit;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Credit” means the nonrefundable angel investor tax credit established by KRS 141.396 and awarded by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-236;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Enhanced incentive counties” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Entity” means any corporation, limited liability company, business development corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional service organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted;

“Fee” means a nonrefundable application fee in an amount set by the authority, to be collected by the authority to offset the cost of administering KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240;

“Full-time employee” means a person that is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week and is subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“Knowledge-based” has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;

“Qualified activity” means any knowledge-based activity related to the new economy focus areas of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation, including but not limited to:
(11) (a)

“Qualified activity” means any knowledge-based activity related to the new economy focus areas of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation, including but not limited to:

Bioscience;

Environmental and energy technology;

Health and human development;

Information technology and communications; and

Materials science and advanced manufacturing.

A “qualified activity” does not include any activity principally engaged in by financial institutions, commercial development companies, credit companies, financial or investment advisors, brokerage or financial firms, other investment funds or investment fund managers, charitable and religious institutions, oil and gas exploration companies, insurance companies, residential housing developers, retail establishments, or any activity that the authority determines in its discretion to be against the public interest, against the purposes of KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240, or in violation of any law. Notwithstanding this paragraph, an entity involved in other technological advances may be deemed to be engaged in qualified activity, as determined by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation;

“Qualified investment” means an investment meeting the requirements of KRS 154.20-234 for qualified investments, and certified pursuant to KRS 154.20-236;

“Qualified investor” means an individual investor meeting the requirements of KRS 154.20-234 for qualified investors, and certified pursuant to KRS 154.20-236; and

“Qualified small business” means an entity meeting the requirements of KRS 154.20-234 for qualified small businesses, and certified pursuant to KRS 154.20-236.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 21, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 22, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 109, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-232.
Purpose of KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240.

KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240 shall be known as the “Kentucky Angel Investment Act.”

The purpose of KRS 141.396 and 154.20-230 to 154.20-240 is to encourage capital investment in the Commonwealth by individual investors that will further the establishment or expansion of small businesses, create additional jobs, and foster the development of new products and technologies, by providing tax credits for certain investments in small businesses located in the Commonwealth, operating in the fields of knowledge-based, high-tech, and research and development, and showing a potential for rapid growth.

To participate in the program created by KRS 141.396 and 154.20-230 to 154.20-240:

Small businesses and individual investors shall request certification from the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-236. To be qualified, the small businesses and individual investors shall fulfill the requirements outlined in KRS 154.20-234;

Once certified, qualified investors may apply to the authority for a credit in return for making the investment if that investment qualifies under KRS 154.20-234; and

Once the authority certifies the qualified investment, the qualified investor may effectuate the investment, pursuant to any and all guidelines issued by the authority.

Any qualified investment made in a qualified small business under KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240 shall be used by that business, insofar as possible, to leverage additional capital investments from other sources.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 22, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 171, § 99, effective April 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 61, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 185, § 110, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-234.
Angel Investor Program qualification requirements.

The requirements for small businesses, investors, and investments to be qualified for participation in the Angel Investor Program are as follows:

To be certified as a qualified small business, the business shall demonstrate to the authority that it is an entity which, at the time the small business requests certification:

Has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less or net income after federal income taxes for each of the two (2) preceding fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less;

Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth, or will be actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth after the receipt of a qualified investment by a qualified investor;

Has no more than one hundred (100) full-time employees;

Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets, operations, and employees located in the Commonwealth; and

Has at no time received an aggregate amount of qualified investments that has allowed qualified investors to receive more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in angel investor credits;

To be certified as a qualified investor, an individual investor shall demonstrate to the authority that he or she:

Is an individual natural person who may utilize a single-member limited liability company to make the investment as long as the individual natural person is the owner and the limited liability company is a disregarded entity;

Qualifies as an accredited investor pursuant to Regulation D of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, 17 C.F.R. sec. 230.501, in effect as of the date the individual investor requests certification;

Does not hold in excess of twenty percent (20%) ownership interest in, and is not employed by, the qualified small business prior to making the qualified investment in that qualified small business;

Is not closely related to an individual who holds in excess of twenty percent (20%) ownership interest in, or who is employed by, the qualified small business prior to making the qualified investment in that qualified small business. For purposes of this subparagraph, “closely related” means any of the following in relation to the owner or owners or spouse of the owner or owners:

Parents or grandparents;

Children or their spouses; or

Siblings or their spouses; and

Seeks a financial return from the investment made in the qualified small business; and

To be certified as a qualified investment, the investment shall:

Be a cash investment of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in a qualified small business by a qualified investor; and

Be offered and executed in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations.

In consideration for the qualified investment, the qualified investor shall receive an equity interest, or a near equity interest, such as a simple agreement for future equity, or “SAFE agreement”, or a convertible debt instrument in the qualified small business.

The authority may establish additional requirements and guidelines for the efficient implementation and administration of the Kentucky Angel Investment Act and to carry out its purposes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 23, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 23, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 185, § 111, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-236.
Total amounts of tax credit that may be awarded — Administrative regulations — Contract for administration and management of certification and application procedure.

The total amount of credit that may be awarded by the authority in each calendar year, pursuant to KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240, to:

All qualified investors shall be no more than three million dollars ($3,000,000); and

Any individual qualified investor shall be no more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

The total amount of credit that may be awarded by the authority to:
(2) (a)

The total amount of credit that may be awarded by the authority to:

All qualified investors pursuant to KRS 154.20-230 to 154.20-240; and

All investors in all investment funds pursuant to KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284; shall be no more than forty million dollars ($40,000,000) in total for all years prior to December 31, 2020.

Beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the amount of credit that may be awarded by the authority in each calendar year shall be equal to the amount provided in subsection (1) of this section.

The authority shall not grant preliminary or final approval for applications received for the Kentucky Angel Investment Act on or after January 1, 2019, but may resume approving applications received on or after January 1, 2021.

The authority shall, by promulgation of an administrative regulation, develop a standard procedure for:

Small businesses and investors to request certification for participation in the program;

Qualified investors to request certification of a planned investment as being a qualified investment, and to apply for a credit; and

The award of credits to qualified investors making qualified investments.

At a minimum, the procedure shall:

Require small businesses and investors to demonstrate to the authority that they, and any planned investment, satisfy all requirements provided in KRS 154.20-234;

Provide small businesses and investors with a standard written application form to request certification and apply for a credit;

Require the payment of a fee; and

Mandate a time period for the duration of certifications granted to small businesses and investors, and the procedures for recertification thereof.

The amount of credit awarded shall not exceed:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the qualified investment, if the principal place of business of the qualified small business is outside an enhanced incentive county; or

Forty percent (40%) of the amount of the qualified investment, if the principal place of business of the qualified small business is in an enhanced incentive county.

Upon approval of a credit, the authority shall reduce the amount of available credit by the amount of credit approved to the qualified investor.

The authority may, in effectuating this section, contract with a science and technology organization as defined in KRS 164.6011 to administer and manage the certification and application procedure established by the authority. However, the final approval of all credits shall be made solely by the authority.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 24, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 207, § 98, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 76, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

154.20-238.
Timetables for investments and credit award approval — Web site reports.

No later than the earlier of:

Eighty (80) days following the date of credit approval, including weekends and holidays; or

December 31 of the calendar year of the approval;

No later than sixty (60) days following the receipt of proof of the qualified investment, the authority shall notify the department of the credit award, the amount of the credit, and the name and Social Security number of the qualified investor that will receive the credit.

If the qualified investor either fails to make the qualified investment or fails to provide the required proof of the qualified investment prior to the deadline, the award of credit approval shall be null and void, and the authority shall notify the qualified investor of the nullification and readjust the amount of credit available.

The authority shall maintain a publicly available Web site on which it shall report:
(4) (a)

The authority shall maintain a publicly available Web site on which it shall report:

A list of all currently certified qualified small businesses and qualified investors;

The total amount of credit it has awarded; and

The total amount of available credit remaining.

This report shall be updated as new small businesses and investors are certified, and as new credits are awarded or the amount of available credit is otherwise adjusted.

The qualified investor shall make the qualified investment and provide proof of the qualified investment to the authority in the manner required by the authority.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 25, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 24, effective July 14, 2018.

154.20-240.
Annual report by small businesses.

On or before February 1 of the calendar year succeeding the year in which a credit was awarded, and continuing for four (4) years thereafter, a qualified small business that has received a qualified investment shall file an annual report with the authority.

This report shall demonstrate that the small business:
(2) (a)

This report shall demonstrate that the small business:

Continues to have more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets, operations, and employees in the Commonwealth;

Has at no time received an aggregate amount of qualified investments that has allowed qualified investors to receive more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in credits; and

Continues to be actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity.

The report shall also provide additional information related to the success of the small business attributable to the investment, including but not limited to:

New jobs created;

Increased sales or other economic activity conducted;

The degree of other private investment attracted; and

Any other information requested by the authority.

If a qualified small business either:

Fails to submit the report mandated by this section in any year; or

Fails to meet any of the criteria listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section at any time during any year of the reporting period; the authority shall notify the department, which shall recapture any portion, or the full amount, of the credit awarded for qualified investments in that qualified small business from the qualified investor that received the credit award or any taxpayer receiving the credit through a valid transfer. Any amounts collected from the recapture shall be deposited in the general fund.

If a qualified small business becomes insolvent and ceases operations at any time before the final required annual report is due, it shall file a written report with the authority attesting to that fact and shall thereafter be exempt from the annual report required by this section, and credits awarded and already claimed for qualified investments in that qualified small business shall not be subject to any recapture. Any credits not claimed as of the date the company became insolvent and ceased operations shall be considered expired and shall not be claimed.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 26, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 76, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.